Hawaii statutes.
§654‑2 Bond. [Repeal and
reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.] When the
plaintiff desires the immediate delivery of the property, the plaintiff shall
execute a bond to the defendant in possession of the property, and to all
persons having an interest in the property, of such amount and with such
sureties as are approved by the court, conditioned that the plaintiff will
prosecute the plaintiff's action to judgment without delay, and deliver the
property to the defendant in possession or any other person, if such delivery
is adjudged, and pay all costs and damages that may be adjudged against the
plaintiff. Upon the filing of the verified complaint or affidavit with the
bond and a motion for immediate consideration of the matter, the court shall
forthwith inquire into the matter, ex parte or otherwise, as in its discretion
it determines. If thereupon the court finds that a prima facie claim for
relief has been established, it shall issue an order directed to the sheriff, sheriff's
deputy, chief of police, an authorized police officer of any county, or an
independent civil process server from the department of public safety's list
under section 353C-10 to take the property therein described and deliver the
same to the plaintiff.

Copies of the verified complaint or affidavit,
and, if a bond for immediate seizure has been filed, of the bond, and, if an
order for the taking has been issued on an ex parte hearing, of the order,
shall forthwith be served upon the defendant in possession and each person
having or claiming a possessory interest in the property, in the same manner as
is provided for service of summons unless the party to be served has appeared
in the action, in which case service may be made in the same manner as is
provided for service of papers other than the summons. In a proper case,
either before or after issuance of an order for the taking, the required
service may be combined with the publication of the summons, in which event the
giving of notice of the substance of the proceeding shall be sufficient.

Upon the application of any party, the
proceeding shall be advanced and assigned for hearing at the earliest possible
date. [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955, §244-21; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS
§654-22; am L 1972, c 90, §1(b); ren HRS §654-2; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 123,
§6 and c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 2002, c 16, §26; am L 2013, c
116, §§17, 25(16)]

Cross References

Bond, see §78-20.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next